Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-315
Mayor; remission of fines; pardons.

The mayor shall have power to remit fines and forfeitures and to grant reprieves and pardons for all offenses arising under the ordinances of the city.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 29, p. 79;

R.S.1913, § 4492;

C.S.1922, § 3878;

C.S.1929, § 15-315;

R.S.1943, § 15-315.